Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 5. Officers and Enlisted Men; Rights and Duties

§ 19-2-501.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

19-9-401

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

§ 19-2-502.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §

19-9-403

by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§§ 19-2-503 through 19-2-506.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1977, ch. 128, § 1, Laws 1955, ch. 52, § 1, Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 32, and Laws 1965, ch. 171, § 3, related to the rights and duties of members of the national guard.